Massachusetts, session 194th, S1488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 80B of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended, in line 13, by inserting after the word "dentists" the following:- ";
psychologists".
of 1